Utah statutes.
63B-18-202.   Revenue bond authorizations -- Board of Regents.
(1)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of the University of Utah, may issue,
sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the
University of Utah to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of
the university, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the
cost of constructing a south campus housing project;
(b)  the University of Utah use student housing rental fees and parking fees
as the primary revenue sources for repayment of any obligation created under
authority of this section;
(c)  the maximum amount of revenue bonds or evidences of indebtedness
authorized by this section is $48,000,000, together with other amounts
necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any
debt service reserve requirements;
(d)  the university may plan, design, and construct the south campus housing
project subject to the requirements of Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building
Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management; and
(e)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance
costs or capital improvements.
(2)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of the University of Utah, may issue,
sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the
University of Utah to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of
the university, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the
cost of constructing an infrastructure development at the university "green
field" site;
(b)  the University of Utah use research overhead funds and infrastructure
fees on new construction projects supported by this infrastructure development
as the primary revenue sources for repayment of any obligation created under
authority of this section;
(c)  the maximum amount of revenue bonds or evidences of indebtedness
authorized by this section is $44,000,000, together with other amounts
necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any
debt service reserve requirements;
(d)  the university may plan, design, and construct the infrastructure
development at the university "green field" site subject to the requirements
of Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities
Construction and Management; and
(e)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance
costs or capital improvements.
(3)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of the University of Utah, may issue,
sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the
University of Utah to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of
the university, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the
cost of constructing an expansion of the University Neuropsychiatric Institute
subject to the requirements of Subsection 63B-17-301(1);
(b)  the University of Utah use institutional funds as the primary revenue
source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this
section; and
(c)  the maximum amount of revenue bonds or evidences of indebtedness
authorized by this section is $45,000,000, together with other amounts
necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any
debt service reserve requirements.
(4)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of Utah State University, may issue,
sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of Utah
State University to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of the
university, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the cost
of constructing a Vernal entrepreneurship and energy research center subject
to the requirements of Subsection 63B-17-301(4);
(b)  Utah State University use institutional funds as the primary revenue
source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this
section; and
(c)  the maximum amount of revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness
authorized by this section is $3,800,000, together with other amounts
necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any
debt service reserve requirements.
